Oklahoma, session 2025, SB371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6-402 of Title 70, unless there

is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. As used in this section, “social networking” or “social

media” means interaction with external websites or services based

upon participant contributions to the content. Types of social

media include social and professional networks, blogs, microblogs,

video or photo sharing, and social bookmarking.

B. School district boards of education in this state shall

adopt policies prohibiting students from using school computers or

devices or school-issued computers or devices to access social

Req. No. 838 Page 1

netw orking or social media platforms, websites, or applications

while on school premises.

C. The State Board of Education may adopt rules to monitor

compliance with the provisions of this section.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-1-838 EB 1/14/2025 3:50:38 PM



























Req. No. 838 Page 2